Vermont statutes. Title 30 Public Service
Subchapter 1. General Powers

§ 201.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Company” or “companies” means and includes individuals, partnerships, associations, corporations, and municipalities owning or conducting any public service business or property used in connection therewith and covered by the provisions of this chapter. The term “company” or “companies” also includes electric cooperatives organized and operating under chapter 81 of this title, the Vermont Public Power Supply Authority to the extent not inconsistent with chapter 84 of this title, and the Vermont Hydroelectric Power Authority to the extent not inconsistent with chapter 90 of this title. In the context of actions requiring prior approval under section 107 of this title, the term “company” shall also mean any individual, partnership, association, corporation, group, syndicate, operating division, joint stock company, trust, other entity, or municipality which would be defined as a company pursuant to this section if such approval were to be granted.

“Electric vehicle supply equipment” means a device or system designed and used specifically to transfer electrical energy to a plug-in electric vehicle as defined in

23 V.S.A. § 4(85)

, either as charge transferred via a physical or wireless connection, by loading a fully charged battery, or by other means. “Electric vehicle supply equipment available to the public” shall:

be located at a publicly available parking space, which does not include a parking space that is part of or associated with a private residence or a parking space that is reserved for the exclusive use of an individual driver, vehicle, or group of drivers or vehicles including employees, tenants, visitors, residents of a common interest development, residents of an adjacent building, or customers of a business whose primary business is not electric vehicle charging;

disclose all charges for the use of the electric vehicle supply equipment at the point of sale; and

provide multiple payment options that allow access by the public, if a fee is required, and shall not require persons desiring to use such public electric vehicle supply equipment to pay a subscription fee or otherwise obtain a membership in any club, association, or organization as a condition of using such electric vehicle supply equipment, but may have different price schedules that are conditioned on a subscription or membership in a club, association, or organization.

“Energy” means not only the traditional scientific characteristic of “ability to do work” but also the substances or processes used to produce heat, light, or motion, including petroleum or other liquid fuels, natural or synthetic fuel gas, solid carbonaceous fuels, solar radiation, geothermal sources, nuclear sources, biomass, organic waste products, wind, or flowing water.

“Energy storage facility” means a stationary device or system that captures energy produced at one time, stores that energy for a period of time, and delivers or may deliver that energy as electricity to the grid for use at a future time.

“Energy storage aggregation” means a virtual resource formed by combining multiple stationary energy storage devices at different points of interconnection on the distribution system.

“Energy storage aggregator” means an entity other than a distribution utility that is operating an energy storage aggregation of 100 kW or greater aggregate nameplate capacity.

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 257

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1981, No. 236

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1985, No. 48

, § 3;

1985, No. 224

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

1989, No. 96

, § 1, eff. June 14, 1989;

1991, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. May 15, 1992;

2003, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 103, eff. June 8, 2004;

2019, No. 31

, § 24;

2019, No. 59

, § 30, eff. June 14, 2019;

2021, No. 54

, § 5.

§ 202.
Electrical energy planning.

The Department of Public Service, through the Director for Regulated Utility Planning, shall constitute the responsible utility planning agency of the State for the purpose of obtaining for all consumers in the State proper utility service at minimum cost under efficient and economical management consistent with other public policy of the State. The Director shall be responsible for the provision of plans for meeting emerging trends related to electrical energy demand, supply, safety, and conservation.

The Department, through the Director, shall prepare the Electrical Energy Plan for the State. The Plan shall be for a 20-year period and shall serve as a basis for State electrical energy policy. The Electrical Energy Plan shall be based on the principles of “least-cost integrated planning” set out in and developed under section 218c of this title. The Plan shall include at a minimum:

an overview, looking 20 years ahead, of statewide growth and development as they relate to future requirements for electrical energy, including patterns of urban expansion, statewide and service area economic growth, shifts in transportation modes, modifications in housing types, and design, conservation, and other trends and factors which, as determined by the Director, will significantly affect State electrical energy policy and programs;

an assessment of all energy resources available to the State for electrical generation or to supply electrical power, including, among others, fossil fuels, nuclear, hydroelectric, biomass, wind, fuel cells, and solar energy and strategies for minimizing the economic and environmental costs of energy supply, including the production of pollutants, by means of efficiency and emission improvements, fuel shifting, and other appropriate means;

estimates of the projected level of electrical energy demand;

a detailed exposition, including capital requirements and the estimated cost to consumers, of how such demand shall be met based on the assumptions made in subdivision (1) of this subsection and the policies set out in subsection (c) of this section;

specific strategies for reducing electric rates to the greatest extent possible in Vermont over the most immediate six-year period, for the next succeeding six-year period, and long-term sustainable strategies for achieving and maintaining the lowest possible electric rates over the full 20-year planning horizon consistent with the goal of maintaining a financially stable electric utility industry in Vermont; and

recommendations for regional and municipal energy planning and standards for issuing a determination of energy compliance pursuant to

24 V.S.A. § 4352

.

In developing the Plan, the Department shall take into account the protection of public health and safety; preservation of environmental quality; the relevant goals of

24 V.S.A. § 4302

; the potential for reduction of rates paid by all retail electricity customers; the potential for reduction of electrical demand through conservation, including alternative utility rate structures; use of load management technologies; efficiency of electrical usage; utilization of waste heat from generation; and utility assistance to consumers in energy conservation.

In establishing plans, the Director shall:

Consult with:

the public;

Vermont municipal utilities and planning commissions;

Vermont cooperative utilities;

Vermont investor-owned utilities;

Vermont electric transmission companies;

environmental and residential consumer advocacy groups active in electricity issues;

industrial customer representatives;

commercial customer representatives;

the Public Utility Commission;

an entity designated to meet the public’s need for energy efficiency services under subdivision 218c(a)(2) of this title;

other interested State agencies;

other energy providers; and

the regional planning commissions.

To the extent necessary, include in the Plan surveys to determine needed and desirable plant improvements and extensions and coordination between utility systems, joint construction of facilities by two or more utilities, methods of operations, and any change that will produce better service or reduce costs. To this end, the Director may require the submission of data by each company subject to supervision, of its anticipated electrical demand, including load fluctuation, supplies, costs, and its plan to meet that demand and such other information as the Director deems desirable.

The Department shall conduct public hearings on the final draft and shall consider the evidence presented at such hearings in preparing the final Plan. The Plan shall be adopted on or before January 1, 2016 and readopted in accordance with this section on or before every sixth January 15 thereafter, and shall be submitted to the General Assembly each time the plan is adopted or readopted. The provisions of

2 V.S.A. § 20(d)

(expiration of required reports) shall not apply to the submission to be made under this subsection.

After adoption by the Department of a final plan, any company seeking Commission authority to make investments, to finance, to site or construct a generation or transmission facility, or to purchase electricity or rights to future electricity, shall notify the Department of the proposed action and request a determination by the Department whether the proposed action is consistent with the Plan. In its determination whether to permit the proposed action, the Commission shall consider the Department’s determination of its consistency with the Plan along with all other factors required by law or relevant to the Commission’s decision on the proposed action. If the proposed action is inconsistent with the Plan, the Commission may nevertheless authorize the proposed action if it finds that there is good cause to do so. The Department shall be a party to any proceeding on the proposed action, except that this section shall not be construed to require a hearing if not otherwise required by law.

The Director shall annually review that portion of a Plan extending over the next six years. The Department, through the Director, shall biennially extend the Plan by two additional years; and from time to time, and in any event every sixth year, institute proceedings to review a Plan and make revisions, where necessary. The six-year review and any interim revisions shall be made according to the procedures established in this section for initial adoption of the Plan. The six-year review and any revisions made in connection with that review shall be performed contemporaneously with readoption of the Comprehensive Energy Plan under section 202b of this title.

The Plans adopted under this section shall become the electrical energy portion of the State Energy Plan.

It shall be a goal of the Electrical Energy Plan to assure, by 2028, that at least 60 MW of power are generated within the State by combined heat and power (CHP) facilities powered by renewable fuels as defined in section 8002 of this title. In order to meet this goal, the Plan shall include incentives for development and strategies to identify locations in the State that would be suitable for CHP. The Plan shall include strategies to assure the consideration of CHP potential during any process related to the expansion of natural gas services in the State.

For the purpose of assisting in the development of municipal and regional plans under 24 V.S.A. chapter 117, the Director shall, on request, provide municipal and regional planning commissions with publicly available information detailing the location of electric transmission and distribution infrastructure in the relevant municipality or region and the capacity of that infrastructure to accept additional electric generation facilities without modification. In providing this information, the Director shall be entitled to the assistance of the electric utilities that own electric transmission or distribution systems, or both, located in Vermont, including the ability to obtain from those utilities such publicly available data as the Director considers necessary to discharge his or her duties under this subsection.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 329

(Adj. Sess.), § 39(b), eff. March 1, 1961;

1979, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 21, eff. Feb. 1, 1981;

1981, No. 236

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

1983, No. 1

, eff. Jan. 31, 1983;

1983, No. 46

;

1983, No. 1

70 (Adj. Sess.), §§ 11, 12, eff. April 19, 1984;

1987, No. 87

, § 3;

1991, No. 259

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 4, 5;

2003, No. 69

, § 5, eff. June 17, 2003;

2007, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 12;

2013, No. 34

, § 18;

2013, No. 91

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. Feb. 4, 2014;

2015, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2017, No. 74

, § 123.

§ 202a.
State energy policy.

It is the general policy of the State of Vermont:

To ensure to the greatest extent practicable that Vermont can meet its energy service needs in a manner that is adequate, reliable, secure, and sustainable; that ensures affordability and encourages the State’s economic vitality, the efficient use of energy resources, and cost-effective demand-side management; and that is environmentally sound.

To identify and evaluate, on an ongoing basis, resources that will meet Vermont’s energy service needs in accordance with the principles of reducing greenhouse gas emissions and least-cost integrated planning, including efficiency, conservation, and load management alternatives; wise use of renewable resources; and environmentally sound energy supply.

To meet Vermont’s energy service needs in a manner that will achieve the greenhouse gas emissions reductions requirements pursuant to 10 V.S.A § 578 and is consistent with the Vermont Climate Action Plan adopted and updated pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 592

.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 236

(Adj. Sess.), § 4; amended

1983, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. April 19, 1984;

1991, No. 259

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2019, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. Sept. 22, 2020.

§ 202b.
State Comprehensive Energy Plan.

The Department of Public Service, in conjunction with other State agencies designated by the Governor, shall prepare a State Comprehensive Energy Plan covering at least a 20-year period. The Plan shall seek to implement the State energy policy set forth in section 202a of this title, including meeting the State’s greenhouse gas emissions reductions requirements pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 578

, and shall be consistent with the relevant goals of

24 V.S.A. § 4302

and with the Vermont Climate Action Plan adopted and updated pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 592

. The State Comprehensive Energy Plan shall include:

a comprehensive analysis and projections regarding the use, cost, supply, and environmental effects of all forms of energy resources used within Vermont;

recommendations for State implementation actions, regulation, legislation, and other public and private action to carry out the Comprehensive Energy Plan, including recommendations for State agency energy plans under

3 V.S.A. § 2291

and transportation planning under Title 19; and

recommendations for regional and municipal energy planning and standards for issuing a determination of energy compliance pursuant to

24 V.S.A. § 4352

.

In developing or updating the Plan’s recommendations, the Department of Public Service shall seek public comment by holding public hearings in at least five different geographic regions of the State on at least three different dates, and by providing notice through publication once a week and at least seven days apart for two or more successive weeks in a newspaper or newspapers of general circulation in the regions where the hearings will be held, and by delivering notices to all licensed commercial radio and television stations with transmitting facilities within the State, plus Vermont Public Radio and Vermont Educational Television.

The Department shall adopt the State Comprehensive Energy Plan on or before January 1, 2016 and shall readopt the Plan on or before every sixth January 15 thereafter. On adoption or readoption, the Plan shall be submitted to the General Assembly. The provisions of

2 V.S.A. § 20(d)

(expiration of required reports) shall not apply to such submission.

Upon adoption of the Plan, analytical portions of the Plan may be updated and published biennially.

Every fourth year after the adoption or readoption of a Plan under this section, the Department shall publish the manner in which the Department will engage the public in the process of readopting the Plan under this section.

The publication requirements of subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection may be met by inclusion of the subject matter in the Department’s biennial report.

The Plan’s implementation recommendations shall be updated by the Department no less frequently than every six years. These recommendations shall be updated prior to the expiration of six years if the General Assembly passes a joint resolution making a request to that effect. If the Department proposes or the General Assembly requests the revision of implementation recommendations, the Department shall hold public hearings on the proposed revisions.

Distribution of the Plan to members of the General Assembly shall be in accordance with the provisions of

2 V.S.A. § 20(a)

-(c).

The Commissioner of Public Service (Commissioner) shall file an annual report on progress in meeting the goals of the Plan. The report shall address each of the following sectors of energy consumption in the State: electricity, nonelectric fuels for thermal purposes, and transportation. In preparing the report, the Commissioner shall consult with the Secretaries of Administration, of Agriculture, Food and Markets, of Natural Resources, and of Transportation and the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services.

The Commissioner shall file the report on or before January 15 of each year, commencing in 2019. The provisions of

2 V.S.A. § 20(d)

shall not apply to this report.

The Commissioner shall file the report with the House Committees on Energy and Technology and on Natural Resources, Fish, and Wildlife and with the Senate Committees on Finance and on Natural Resources and Energy.

For each sector, the report shall provide:

In millions of British thermal units (MMBTUs) for the most recent calendar year for which data are available, the total amount of energy consumed, the amount of renewable energy consumed, and the percentage of renewable energy consumed. For the electricity sector, the report shall also state the amounts in megawatt hours (MWH) and the Vermont and New England summer and winter peak electric demand, including the hour and day of peak demand.

Projections of the energy reductions and shift to renewable energy expected to occur under existing policies, technologies, and markets. The most recent available data shall be used to inform these projections and shall be provided as a supplement to the data described in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (3).

Recommendations of policies to further the renewable energy goals set forth in statute and the Plan, along with an evaluation of the relative cost-effectiveness of different policy approaches.

The report shall include a supplemental analysis setting forth how progress toward the goals of the Plan is supported by complementary work in avoiding or reducing energy consumption through efficiency and demand reduction. In this subdivision (4), “demand reduction” includes dispatchable measures, such as controlling appliances that consume energy, and nondispatchable measures, such as weatherization.

The report shall include recommendations on methods to enhance the process for planning, tracking, and reporting progress toward meeting statutory energy goals and the goals of the Plan. Such recommendations may include the consolidation of one or more periodic reports filed by the Department or other State agencies relating to renewable energy, with proposals for amending the statutes relevant to those reports.

The report shall include a summary of the following information for each sector:

major changes in relevant markets, technologies, and costs;

average Vermont prices compared to the other New England states, based on the most recent available data; and

significant Vermont and federal incentive programs that are relevant to one or more of the sectors.

The report shall include any activity that occurs under the Vermont Small Hydropower Assistance Program, the Vermont Village Green Program, and the Fuel Efficiency Fund.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 236

(Adj. Sess.), § 5; amended

1991, No. 259

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2013, No. 91

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. Feb. 4, 2014;

2015, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2017, No. 74

, § 124;

2017, No. 139

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2019, No. 31

, § 4;

2019, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. Sept. 22, 2020.

§ 202c.
State telecommunications; policy and planning.

The General Assembly finds that advances in telecommunications technology and changes in federal regulatory policy are rapidly reshaping telecommunications services, thereby promising the people and businesses of the State communication and access to information, while creating new challenges for maintaining a robust, modern telecommunications network in Vermont.

Therefore, to direct the benefits of improved telecommunications technology to all Vermonters, it is the purpose of this section and section 202d of this title to:

strengthen the State’s role in telecommunications planning;

support the universal availability of appropriate infrastructure and affordable services for transmitting voice and high-speed data;

support the availability of modern mobile wireless telecommunications services along the State’s travel corridors and in the State’s communities;

provide for high-quality, reliable telecommunications services for Vermont businesses and residents;

provide the benefits of future advances in telecommunications technologies to Vermont residents and businesses;

support competitive choice for consumers among telecommunications service providers and promote open access among competitive service providers on nondiscriminatory terms to networks over which broadband and telecommunications services are delivered;

support the application of telecommunications technology to maintain and improve governmental and public services, public safety, and the economic development of the State;

support deployment of broadband infrastructure that:

uses the best commercially available technology;

does not negatively affect the ability of Vermont to take advantage of future improvements in broadband technology or result in widespread installation of technology that becomes outmoded within a short period after installation;

in the deployment of broadband infrastructure, encourage the use of existing facilities, such as existing utility poles and corridors and other structures, in preference to the construction of new facilities or the replacement of existing structures with taller structures; and

support measures designed to ensure that by the end of the year 2024 every E-911 business and residential location in Vermont has infrastructure capable of delivering Internet access with service that has a minimum download speed of 100 Mbps and is symmetrical.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 87

, § 1; amended

2003, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 15, eff. June 12, 2004;

2009, No. 54

, § 49, eff. June 1, 2009;

2011, No. 53

, § 24b, eff. May 27, 2011;

2013, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. June 16, 2014.

§ 202d.
Telecommunications plan.

The Department of Public Service shall constitute the responsible planning agency of the State for the purpose of obtaining for all consumers in the State stable and predictable rates and a technologically advanced telecommunications network serving all service areas in the State. The Department shall be responsible for the provision of plans for meeting emerging trends related to telecommunications technology, markets, financing, and competition.

The Department shall prepare the Telecommunications Plan for the State. The Agency of Digital Services, the Agency of Commerce and Community Development, and the Agency of Transportation shall assist the Department in preparing the Plan. The Plan shall be for a 10-year period and shall serve as a basis for State telecommunications policy. Prior to preparing the Plan, the Department shall prepare:

An overview, looking 10 years ahead, of statewide growth and development as they relate to future requirements for telecommunications services, including patterns of urban expansion, statewide and service area economic growth, shifts in transportation modes, economic development, technological advances, and other trends and factors that will significantly affect State telecommunications policy and programs. The overview shall include an economic and demographic forecast sufficient to determine infrastructure investment goals and objectives.

One or more surveys of Vermont residents and businesses, conducted in cooperation with the Agency of Commerce and Community Development to determine what telecommunications services are needed now and in the succeeding 10 years, generally, and with respect to the following specific sectors in Vermont;

the educational sector, with input from the Secretary of Education;

the health care and human services sectors, with input from the Commissioner of Health and the Secretary of Human Services;

the public safety sector, with input from the Commissioner of Public Safety and the Executive Director of the Enhanced 911 Board; and

the workforce training and development sectors, with input from the Commissioner of Labor.

An assessment of the current state of telecommunications infrastructure.

An assessment, conducted in cooperation with the Agency of Digital Services and the Agency of Transportation, of State-owned and managed telecommunications systems and related infrastructure and an evaluation, with specific goals and objectives, of alternative proposals for upgrading the systems to provide the best available and affordable technology for use by State and local government, public safety, educational institutions, community media, nonprofit organizations performing governmental functions, and other community anchor institutions.

A geographically specific assessment of the status, coverage, and capacity of telecommunications networks and services available throughout Vermont, a comparison of available services relative to other states, including price and broadband speed comparisons for key services and comparisons of the status of technology deployment.

An assessment of opportunities for shared infrastructure, open access, and neutral host wireless facilities that is sufficiently specific to guide the Public Utility Commission, the Department, State and local governments, and telecommunications service companies in the deployment of new technology.

[Repealed.]

With respect to emergency communications, an analysis of all federal initiatives and requirements, including the Department of Commerce FirstNet initiative and the Department of Homeland Security Statewide Communication Interoperability Plan, and how these activities can best be integrated with strategies to advance the State’s interest in achieving ubiquitous deployment of mobile telecommunications and broadband services within Vermont.

An analysis of alternative strategies to leverage the State’s ownership and management of the public rights-of-way to create opportunities for accelerating the buildout of fiber-optic broadband and for increasing network resiliency capacity.

In developing the Plan, the Department shall address each of the State telecommunications policies and goals of section 202c of this title, and shall assess initiatives designed to advance and make measurable progress with respect to each of those policies and goals. The assessment shall include identification of the resources required and potential sources of funding for Plan implementation.

The Department shall establish a participatory planning process that includes effective provisions for increased public participation. In establishing plans, public hearings shall be held and the Department shall consult with members of the public, representatives of telecommunications utilities with a certificate of public good, other providers, including the Vermont Electric Power Co., Inc. (VELCO) and communications union districts, and other interested State agencies, particularly the Agency of Commerce and Community Development, the Agency of Transportation, and the Agency of Digital Services, whose views shall be considered in preparation of the Plan. To the extent necessary, the Department shall include in the Plan surveys to determine existing, needed, and desirable plant improvements and extensions, access and coordination between telecommunications providers, methods of operations, and any change that will produce better service or reduce costs. To this end, the Department may require the submission of data by each company subject to supervision by the Public Utility Commission.

Before adopting the Plan, the Department shall first prepare and publish a preliminary draft and solicit public comment. The Department’s procedures for soliciting public comment shall include a method for submitting comments electronically. After review and consideration of the comments received, the Department shall prepare a final draft. This final draft shall either incorporate public comments received with respect to the preliminary draft or shall include a detailed explanation as to why specific individual comments were not incorporated. The Department shall conduct at least four public hearings across the State on the final draft and shall consider the testimony presented at such hearings when preparing the Plan. The Department shall coordinate with Vermont’s access media organizations when planning the public hearings required by this subsection. At least one public hearing shall be held jointly with committees of the General Assembly designated by the General Assembly for this purpose.

The Department shall adopt a new Plan every three years pursuant to the procedures established in subsection (e) of this section. The Plan shall outline significant deviations from the prior Plan. For good cause or upon request by a joint resolution passed by the General Assembly, an interim review and revision of any section of the Plan may be made after conducting public hearings on the interim revision. At least one hearing shall be held jointly with committees of the General Assembly designated by the General Assembly for this purpose.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 87

, § 2; amended

1995, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 1(a);

2003, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 16, eff. June 12, 2004;

2013, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 9, eff. June 16, 2014;

2015, No. 41

, § 3;

2017, No. 41

, § 1, eff. May 22, 2017;

2019, No. 79

, § 22, eff. June 20, 2019;

2019, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § B.1105, eff. Oct. 2, 2020.

§ 202e.
Telecommunications and connectivity.

Among other powers and duties specified in this title, the Department of Public Service, through the Division for Telecommunications and Connectivity, shall promote:

access to affordable broadband service to all residences and businesses in all regions of the State, to be achieved in a manner that is consistent with the State Telecommunications Plan;

universal availability of mobile telecommunication services, including voice and high-speed data along roadways, and near universal availability statewide;

investment in telecommunications infrastructure in the State that creates or completes the network for service providers to create last-mile connection to the home or business and supports the best available and economically feasible service capabilities;

the continuous upgrading of telecommunications and broadband infrastructure in all areas of the State to reflect the rapid evolution in the capabilities of available broadband and mobile telecommunications technologies, the capabilities of broadband and mobile telecommunications services needed by persons, businesses, and institutions in the State; and

the most efficient use of both public and private resources through State policies by encouraging the development, funding, and implementation of open access telecommunications infrastructure.

To achieve the goals specified in subsection (a) of this section, the Division shall:

provide resources to local, regional, public, and private entities in the form of grants, technical assistance, coordination, and other incentives;

prioritize the use of existing buildings and structures, historic or otherwise, as sites for visually-neutral placement of mobile telecommunications and wireless broadband antenna facilities;

inventory and assess the potential to use federal radio frequency licenses held by instrumentalities of the State to enable broadband service in unserved areas of the State; take steps to promote the use of those licensed radio frequencies for that purpose; and recommend to the General Assembly any further legislative measures with respect to ownership, management, and use of these licenses as would promote the general good of the State;

coordinate telecommunications initiatives among Executive Branch agencies, departments, and offices;

identify the types and locations of infrastructure and services needed to carry out the goals stated in subsection (a) of this section;

formulate, with the advice and assistance of the Telecommunications and Connectivity Board and with input from the regional planning commissions, an action plan that conforms with the State Telecommunications Plan, as updated and revised, and carries out the goals stated in subsection (a) of this section;

coordinate the agencies of the State to make public resources available to support the extension of broadband and mobile telecommunications infrastructure and services to all unserved and underserved areas;

support and facilitate initiatives to extend the availability of broadband and mobile telecommunications, and promote development of the infrastructure that enables the provision of these services;

work cooperatively with the Agency of Transportation and the Department of Buildings and General Services to assist in making available transportation rights-of-way and other State facilities and infrastructure for telecommunications projects in conformity with applicable federal statutes and regulations; and

receive all technical and administrative assistance as deemed necessary by the Director for Telecommunications and Connectivity.

The Director may request from telecommunications service providers voluntary disclosure of information regarding deployment of broadband, telecommunications facilities, or advanced metering infrastructure that is not publicly funded. Such information may include data identifying projected coverage areas, projected average speed of service, service type, and the anticipated date of completion in addition to identifying the location and routes of proposed cables, wires, and telecommunications facilities.
(c) (1) The Director may request from telecommunications service providers voluntary disclosure of information regarding deployment of broadband, telecommunications facilities, or advanced metering infrastructure that is not publicly funded. Such information may include data identifying projected coverage areas, projected average speed of service, service type, and the anticipated date of completion in addition to identifying the location and routes of proposed cables, wires, and telecommunications facilities.

The Director may enter into a nondisclosure agreement with respect to any voluntary disclosures under this subsection, and the information disclosed pursuant thereto shall remain confidential. Alternatively, entities that voluntarily provide information requested under this subsection may select a third party to be the recipient of such information. The third party may aggregate information provided by the entities, but shall not disclose provider-specific information it has received under this subsection to any person, including the Director. The third party shall only disclose the aggregated information to the Director. The Director may publicly disclose aggregated information based upon the information provided under this subsection. The confidentiality requirements of this subsection shall not affect whether information provided to any agency of the State or a political subdivision of the State pursuant to other laws is or is not subject to disclosure.

The Division shall only promote the expansion of broadband services that offer actual speeds that meet or exceed the minimum technical service characteristic objectives contained in the State’s Telecommunications Plan.

Notwithstanding

2 V.S.A. § 20(d)

, on or before January 15 of each year, the Director, with the advice and assistance of the Telecommunications and Connectivity Board, shall submit a report of its activities pursuant to this section and duties of subsection 202f(f) of this title for the preceding fiscal year to the General Assembly. Each report shall include an operating and financial statement covering the Division’s operations during the year, including a summary of all grant awards and contracts and agreements entered into by the Division, as well as the action plan required under subdivision (b)(6) of this section. In addition, the report shall include an accurate map and narrative description of each of the following:

the areas served and the areas not served by broadband that has a download speed of at least 4 Mbps and an upload speed of at least 1 Mbps, and cost estimates for providing such service to unserved areas;

the areas served and the areas not served by broadband that has a download speed of at least 25 Mbps and an upload speed of at least 3 Mbps, or as defined by the FCC in its annual report to Congress required by section 706 of the Telecommunications Act of 1996, whichever is higher, and the cost estimates for providing such service to unserved areas;

the areas served and the areas not served by broadband that has a download speed of at least 100 Mbps and is symmetrical, and the cost estimates for providing such service to unserved areas; and

if monetarily feasible, the areas served and the areas not served by wireless communications service, and cost estimates for providing such service to unserved areas.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 41

, § 4.